Missouri, session 2026, SB1718.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.030 and 287.128, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 287.030 and 287.128, to read as follows:
287.030. 1. The word "employer" as used in this
chapter shall be construed to mean:
(1) Every person, partnership, association,
corporation, limited liability partnership or company,
trustee, receiver, the legal representatives of a deceased
employer, and every other person, including any person or
corporation operating a railroad and any public service
corporation, using the service of another for pay;
(2) The state, county, municipal corporation,
township, school or road, drainage, swamp and levee
districts, or school boards, board of education, regents,
curators, managers or control commission, board or any other
political subdivision, corporation, or quasi-corporation, or
cities under special charter, or under the commission form
of government;
(3) Any of the above-defined employers must have five
or more employees to be deemed an employer for the purposes
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1718 2
of this chapter unless election is made to become subject to
the provisions of this chapter as provided in subsection 2
of section 287.090, [except that] and construction industry
employers who erect, demolish, alter or repair improvements
shall be deemed an employer for the purposes of this chapter
if they have [one] five or more employees. An employee who
is a member of the employer's family within the third degree
of affinity or consanguinity shall be counted in determining
the total number of employees of such employer.
2. Any reference to the employer shall also include
his or her insurer or group self-insurer.
287.128. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to
knowingly present or cause to be presented any false or
fraudulent claim for the payment of benefits pursuant to a
workers' compensation claim.
2. It shall be unlawful for any insurance company or
self-insurer in this state to knowingly and intentionally
refuse to comply with known and legally indisputable
compensation obligations with intent to defraud.
3. It shall be unlawful for any person to:
(1) Knowingly present multiple claims for the same
occurrence with intent to defraud;
(2) Knowingly assist, abet, solicit or conspire with:
(a) Any person who knowingly presents any false or
fraudulent claim for the payment of benefits;
(b) Any person who knowingly presents multiple claims
for the same occurrence with an intent to defraud; or
(c) Any person who purposefully prepares, makes or
subscribes to any writing with the intent to present or use
the same, or to allow it to be presented in support of any
such claim;

SB 1718 3
(3) Knowingly make or cause to be made any false or
fraudulent claim for payment of a health care benefit;
(4) Knowingly submit a claim for a health care benefit
which was not used by, or on behalf of, the claimant;
(5) Knowingly present multiple claims for payment of
the same health care benefit with an intent to defraud;
(6) Knowingly make or cause to be made any false or
fraudulent material statement or material representation for
the purpose of obtaining or denying any benefit;
(7) Knowingly make or cause to be made any false or
fraudulent statements with regard to entitlement to benefits
with the intent to discourage an injured worker from making
a legitimate claim;
(8) Knowingly make or cause to be made a false or
fraudulent material statement to an investigator of the
division in the course of the investigation of fraud or
noncompliance.
For the purposes of subdivisions (6), (7), and (8) of this
subsection, the term "statement" includes any notice, proof
of injury, bill for services, payment for services, hospital
or doctor records, X-ray or test results.
4. Any person violating any of the provisions of
subsection 1 or 2 of this section shall be guilty of a class
E felony. In addition, the person shall be liable to the
state of Missouri for a fine up to ten thousand dollars or
double the value of the fraud whichever is greater. Any
person violating any of the provisions of subsection 3 of
this section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and
the person shall be liable to the state of Missouri for a
fine up to ten thousand dollars. Any person who has
previously been found guilty of violating any of the

SB 1718 4
provisions of subsection 1, 2 or 3 of this section and who
subsequently violates any of the provisions of subsection 1,
2 or 3 of this section shall be guilty of a class D felony.
5. It shall be unlawful for any person, company, or
other entity to prepare or provide an invalid certificate of
insurance as proof of workers' compensation insurance. Any
person violating any of the provisions of this subsection
shall be guilty of a class E felony and, in addition, shall
be liable to the state of Missouri for a fine up to ten
thousand dollars or double the value of the fraud, whichever
is greater.
6. Any person who knowingly misrepresents any fact in
order to obtain workers' compensation insurance at less than
the proper rate for that insurance shall be guilty of a
class A misdemeanor. Any person who has previously been
found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this
section and who subsequently violates any of the provisions
of this section shall be guilty of a class E felony.
7. Any employer who knowingly fails to insure his or
her liability pursuant to this chapter shall result in a
written warning for the first violation and upon a second
violation or any additional subsequent violations thereafter
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and, in addition,
shall be liable to the state of Missouri for a penalty in an
amount up to three times the annual premium the employer
would have paid had such employer been insured or up to
fifty thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. [Any
person who has previously been found guilty of violating any
of the provisions of this section and who subsequently
violates any of the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class E felony.]

SB 1718 5
8. Any person may file a complaint alleging fraud or
noncompliance with this chapter with a legal advisor in the
division of workers' compensation. The legal advisor shall
refer the complaint to the fraud and noncompliance unit
within the division. The unit shall investigate all
complaints and present any finding of fraud or noncompliance
to the director, who may refer the file to the attorney
general. The attorney general may prosecute any fraud or
noncompliance associated with this chapter. All costs
incurred by the attorney general associated with any
investigation and prosecution pursuant to this subsection
shall be paid out of the workers' compensation fund. Any
fines or penalties levied and received as a result of any
prosecution under this section shall be paid to the workers'
compensation fund. Any restitution ordered as a part of the
judgment shall be paid to the person or persons who were
defrauded.
100 9. Any and all reports, records, tapes, photographs,
101 and similar materials or documentation submitted by any
102 person, including the department of commerce and insurance,
103 to the fraud and noncompliance unit or otherwise obtained by
104 the unit pursuant to this section, used to conduct an
105 investigation for any violation under this chapter, shall be
106 considered confidential and not subject to the requirements
107 of chapter 610. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the
108 fraud and noncompliance unit from releasing records used to
109 conduct an investigation to the local, state, or federal law
110 enforcement authority or federal or state agency conducting
111 an investigation, upon written request.
112 10. There is hereby established in the division of
113 workers' compensation a fraud and noncompliance
114 administrative unit responsible for investigating incidences

SB 1718 6
115 of fraud and failure to comply with the provisions of this
116 chapter.
117 11. Any prosecution for a violation of the provisions
118 of this section or section 287.129 shall be commenced within
119 three years after discovery of the offense by an aggrieved
120 party or by a person who has a legal duty to represent an
121 aggrieved party and who is not a party to the offense. As
122 used in this subsection, the term "person who has a legal
123 duty to represent an aggrieved party" shall mean the
124 attorney general or the prosecuting attorney having
125 jurisdiction to prosecute the action.
126 12. By January 1, 2006, the attorney general shall
127 forward to the division and the members of the general
128 assembly the first edition of an annual report of the costs
129 of prosecuting fraud and noncompliance under this chapter.
130 The report shall include the number of cases filed with the
131 attorney general by county by the fraud and noncompliance
132 unit, the number of cases prosecuted by county by the
133 attorney general, fines and penalties levied and received,
134 and all incidental costs.
✓